Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB668.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 6129. Identification required for purchase of firearm ammunition.(a) Identification.--Except as provided under subsection (b), a person may not sell or deliver firearm ammunition to a purchaser or transferee unless the purchaser or transferee presents an official form of photographic identification, including, but not limited to, a driver's license, official Pennsylvania photo identification card or official government photo identification card.(b) Exception.--An individual who is a member of a recognized religious sect or community whose tenets forbid or 12345678910111213141516171819 discourage the taking of photographs of members of that sect or community may present a valid-without-photo driver's license or a combination of documents, as prescribed by the Pennsylvania State Police, containing the individual's name, address, date of birth and signature.(c) Penalties.--A person that violates this section shall be subject to a fine of:(1) $1,000 for a first offense.(2) $2,000 for a second offense.(3) $3,000 for a third or subsequent offense.(d) Prohibition on ammunition sales.--A person that violates this section shall be prohibited from selling ammunition for 30 days following a third or subsequent offense.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0668PN0681 - 2 - 1234567891011121314